Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF823.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Laws 2023, chapter 68, article 1, section 17, subdivision 10, is amended to read: Subd. 10. U.S. Highway 169/Trunk Highway 282 interchange; Jordan. $4,900,000 in fiscal year 2024 is appropriated from the general fund to the commissioner of transportation for deleted text begin a grant to Scott County fordeleted text end design and construction of local road improvements associated with an interchange at marked U.S. Highway 169, marked Trunk Highway 282, and Scott County State-Aid Highway 9 in the city of Jordan, including accommodations for bicycles and pedestrians, rail grade separation, road work, and public utility relocations. This is a onetime appropriation and is available until June 30, 2027. new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment. new text end Sec. 2. new text begin SHAKOPEE; LIT MUNICIPAL SIGN.new text end new text begin The commissioner of transportation must immediately authorize lighting for the Shakopee identification sign located on the active transportation bridge over marked U.S. Highway 169 in the vicinity of the interchange with marked Trunk Highway 101. The cost to install and maintain the lighting is the responsibility of the city of Shakopee. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment. new text end